Alabama, session 2026rs, HB625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Cleburne County Revenue Commissioner
may establish procedures for electronic filing for the
reporting, assessment, and payment of business personal
property taxes pursuant to Section 40-7-59, Code of Alabama
1975. A complete business personal property tax return filed
electronically shall be in the format prescribed by the
revenue commissioner and shall contain the same information as
a business personal property tax return filed on paper. The
timely filing and electronic signature requirements shall be
as provided by the revenue commissioner generally in
conformance with existing procedures for electronic filing of
other electronic tax returns.
(b) Effective for any business personal property tax
return filed on or after October 1, 2026, the Cleburne County
Revenue Commissioner may require any of the following business
personal property tax returns to be filed electronically:
(1) A return filed by any business engaged in the
leasing of personal property.
(2) A return filed by any business with personal
property assets of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more.
(3) A return prepared for filing by any third-party tax
Page 1

(3) A return prepared for filing by any third-party tax
HB625 Enrolled
preparer.
(c) The Cleburne County Revenue Commissioner shall
conduct training sessions and otherwise assist any taxpayer in
the procedures for electronic filing pursuant to this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB625 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 31-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3